Indiana, session 2026, HB1205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-18-15-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.257-2019,
SECTION 83, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) The persons involved shall negotiate the
terms for connection and service under this chapter.
(b) If service is ordered under this chapter, a receiver of that service
that is located in an unincorporated area may grant a waiver to a
municipality providing the service. A waiver under this section:
(1) must waive the receiver's right of remonstrance against
annexation of the areas in which the service is to be provided; and
(2) may be one (1) of the terms for connection and service
described in subsection (a).
(c) The waiver, if granted:
(1) shall be noted on the deed of each property affected and
recorded as provided by law; and
(2) is considered a covenant running with the land.
(d) This subsection applies to any deed recorded after June 30,
2015. This subsection applies only to property that is subject to a
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


remonstrance waiver. A municipality shall, within a reasonable time
after the recording of a deed to property located within the
municipality, provide written notice to the property owner that a waiver
of the right of remonstrance exists with respect to the property.
(e) A remonstrance waiver executed before July 1, 2003, is void.
This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(f) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2003, and before
July 1, 2019, is subject to the following:
(1) The waiver is void unless the waiver was recorded (A) before
January 1, 2020, and (B) with the county recorder of the county
where the property subject to the waiver is located.
(2) A waiver that is not void under subdivision (1) or subsection
(h) expires not later than fifteen (15) years after the date the
waiver is executed.
This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(g) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2019, is subject
to the following: (1) The waiver is void unless the waiver is must be
recorded (A) not later than thirty (30) business days after the date the
waiver was executed and (B) with the county recorder of the county
where the property subject to the waiver is located. (2) A waiver that
is not void under subdivision (1) expires not later than fifteen (15)
years after the date the waiver is executed. This subsection does not
invalidate an annexation that was effective on or before July 1, 2019.
(h) Notwithstanding any other law, a waiver of the right of
remonstrance is valid and binding on a landowner or a successor
in title only with regard to an annexation for which the written
fiscal plan was adopted before March 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. IC 36-4-3-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2016,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.5. (a) For purposes of this chapter, territory
sought to be annexed may be considered "contiguous" only if at least
one-eighth (1/8) of the aggregate external boundaries of the territory
coincides with the boundaries of the annexing municipality. In
determining if a territory is contiguous, a strip of land less than one
hundred fifty (150) feet wide that connects the annexing municipality
to the territory is not considered a part of the boundaries of either the
municipality or the territory.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a
proposed annexation territory consists of:
(1) land that:
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(A) is contiguous to the municipality under subsection (a);
and
(B) abuts, at least in part, one (1) side of the railroad tracks
and railroad right-of-way; and
(2) land:
(A) that is not contiguous to the municipality under
subsection (a); and
(B) that:
(i) is separated from the land under subdivision (1) by;
and
(ii) abuts, at least in part, the opposite side of;
the railroad tracks and railroad right-of-way described in
subdivision (1)(B);
the proposed annexation territory satisfies the contiguity
requirements of this section. The annexing municipality is not
required to obtain the consent of any person owning, leasing,
operating, or using the railroad tracks or railroad right-of-way to
annex the proposed territory.
(c) Subsections (d) and (e) apply only to an annexation:
(1) under:
(A) section 4 of this chapter (excluding those annexations
under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter);
or
(B) section 3, 5, or 5.1 of this chapter (excluding an
annexation under section 5.2 of this chapter); and
(2) for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30,
2026.
(b) (d) This subsection applies to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance is adopted after June 30, 2015. A public highway
or the rights-of-way of a public highway are contiguous to:
(1) the municipality; or
(2) property in the unincorporated area adjacent to the public
highway or rights-of-way of a public highway;
if the public highway or the rights-of-way of a public highway are
contiguous under subsection (a) and one (1) of the requirements in
subsection (c) (e) is satisfied.
(c) (e) A public highway or the rights-of-way of a public highway
are not contiguous unless one (1) of the following requirements is met:
(1) The municipality obtains the written consent of the owners of
all property:
(A) adjacent to the entire length of the part of the public
highway and rights-of-way of the public highway that is being
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


annexed; and
(B) not already within the corporate boundaries of the
municipality.
A waiver of the right of remonstrance executed by a property
owner or a successor in title of the property owner for sewer
services or water services does not constitute written consent for
purposes of this subdivision.
(2) All property adjacent to at least one (1) side of the entire
length of the part of the public highway or rights-of-way of the
public highway being annexed is already within the corporate
boundaries of the municipality.
(3) All property adjacent to at least one (1) side of the entire
length of the part of the public highway or rights-of-way of the
public highway being annexed is part of the same annexation
ordinance in which the public highway or rights-of-way of a
public highway are being annexed.
A municipality may not annex a public highway or the rights-of-way of
a public highway or annex territory adjacent to the public highway or
rights-of-way of a public highway unless the requirements of this
section are met.
SECTION 3. IC 36-4-3-1.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1.7. (a) This section applies only to an
annexation ordinance adopted after June 30, 2015. This section does
not apply to an annexation under section 5.1 of this chapter.
(b) Not earlier than six (6) months before a municipality introduces
an annexation ordinance, the municipality shall conduct an outreach
program to inform citizens regarding the proposed annexation. For an
annexation under section 3 or 4 of this chapter, for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026, the outreach program
must conduct at least six (6) public information meetings regarding the
proposed annexation. For an annexation under section 5, or 5.2, or 5.5
of this chapter, the outreach program must conduct at least three (3)
public information meetings regarding the proposed annexation. The
public information meetings must provide citizens with the following
information:
(1) Maps showing the proposed boundaries of the annexation
territory.
(2) Proposed plans for extension of capital and noncapital
services in the annexation territory, including proposed dates of
extension. In the case of an annexation under section 5.2 of this
chapter, a copy of the preliminary written fiscal plan.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(3) Expected fiscal impact on taxpayers in the annexation
territory, including any increase in taxes and fees.
(c) The municipality shall provide notice of the dates, times, and
locations of the outreach program meetings. The municipality shall
publish the notice of the meetings under IC 5-3-1, including the date,
time, and location of the meetings, except that notice must be published
not later than thirty (30) days before the date of each meeting. The
municipality shall also send notice to each owner of land within the
annexation territory not later than thirty (30) days before the date of the
first meeting of the outreach program. The notice to landowners shall
be sent by first class mail, certified mail with return receipt requested,
or any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt and must
include the following information:
(1) The notice to the landowner must inform the landowner that
the municipality is proposing to annex territory that includes the
landowner's property.
(2) The municipality is conducting an outreach program for the
purpose of providing information to landowners and the public
regarding the proposed annexation.
(3) The date, time, and location of the meetings to be conducted
under the outreach program.
(d) The notice shall be sent to the address of the landowner as listed
on the tax duplicate. If the municipality provides evidence that the
notice was sent:
(1) by certified mail, with return receipt requested or any other
means of delivery that includes a return receipt; and
(2) in accordance with this section;
it is not necessary that the landowner accept receipt of the notice.
(e) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which a
written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026. If a
remonstrance is filed under section 11 of this chapter, the municipality
shall file with the court proof that notices were sent to landowners
under this section and proof of publication.
(e) (f) The notice required under this section is in addition to any
notice required under sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 36-4-3-3.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 3.1. (a) This section does not apply to an
annexation under:
(1) section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), 4(h), or 4.1 of this chapter; or
(2) section 5.1(a)(1) or 5.1(a)(2) of this chapter, if the
annexation ordinance is adopted after March 29, 2026.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(b) A municipality shall develop and adopt a written fiscal plan and
establish a definite policy by resolution of the legislative body that
meets the requirements set forth in section 13 of this chapter.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) and section 5.2 of this
chapter, the municipality shall establish and adopt the written fiscal
plan before mailing the notification to landowners in the territory
proposed to be annexed under section 2.2 of this chapter.
(d) In an annexation under section 5 or 5.1 of this chapter, The
municipality shall establish and adopt the written fiscal plan before
adopting the an annexation ordinance in an annexation under section
5, 5.1, or 5.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 5. IC 36-4-3-4.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.228-2015,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.1. (a) A municipality may annex territory
under this section or (after June 30, 2015) this chapter only if the
territory is contiguous to the municipality.
(b) This subsection applies only to an annexation ordinance adopted
before July 1, 2015. Territory annexed under this section is exempt
from all property tax liability under IC 6-1.1 for municipal purposes for
all portions of the annexed territory that are classified for zoning
purposes as agricultural and remain exempt from the property tax
liability while the property's zoning classification remains agricultural.
(c) (b) This subsection applies only to an annexation ordinance
adopted after June 30, 2015. Real property annexed under this chapter:
(1) is exempt; and
(2) remains exempt;
from all property tax liability under IC 6-1.1 for municipal purposes
while the property is assessed as agricultural land under the real
property assessment rules and guidelines of the department of local
government finance.
(d) (c) There may not be a change in the zoning classification of
territory annexed under this section without the consent of the owner
of the annexed territory.
(e) (d) Territory annexed under this section or (after June 30, 2015)
this chapter may not be considered a part of the municipality for
purposes of annexing additional territory under section 3 or 4 of this
chapter. However, territory annexed under this section or (after June
30, 2015) this chapter shall be considered a part of the municipality for
purposes of annexing additional contiguous territory under section 5
or 5.1 of this chapter.
SECTION 6. IC 36-4-3-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4.7. (a) This section applies to a petition
filed after December 31, 2026, in an annexation under section 5,
5.1, or 5.5 of this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies to an annexation under section 5 or
5.1 of this chapter. The state board of accounts shall design a form
for a petition that is circulated in person by a carrier. The petition
form must include the following:
(1) Multiple signature lines on each page for affixing
signatures. On each page where signatures are affixed the
petition must have a heading that is substantially similar to
the following:
"PETITION FOR ANNEXATION INTO THE (insert
whether city or town) OF (insert name of city or town).".
(2) The petition must include a space for each signer to enter
the address of the property owned by the signer in the
annexation territory.
(3) The petition must include a certificate for the carrier to
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature that is affixed to the petition.
(4) The petition must include or be accompanied by the
following instructions:
(A) The carrier and any person who signs the petition must
be owners of property in the proposed annexation
territory.
(B) The carrier of a petition must be a signatory on at least
one (1) petition.
(C) A person signing a petition must put the address of the
property owned by the person in the annexation territory
on the petition.
(D) After collecting the signatures, the carrier must swear
or affirm before a notary public that the carrier witnessed
each person sign the petition.
(c) This subsection applies to an annexation under section 5, 5.1,
or 5.5 of this chapter. The state board of accounts shall design a
form for a petition that is to be signed by one (1) landowner. The
petition form must include the following:
(1) On the page where the signature of the individual is
affixed, a heading that is substantially similar to the
following:
"PETITION FOR ANNEXATION INTO THE (insert
whether city or town) OF (insert name of city or town).".
(2) The petition must include a space for a signer to enter the
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


address of the property owned by the signer in the annexation
territory.
(3) The petition must include the following printed statement:
"I swear or affirm that the information I have entered on
this form is correct to the best of my knowledge and
belief.".
(4) The person must sign the person's name below the printed
statement.
(5) The petition must include the following instructions:
(A) The person signing the petition must be an owner of
property in the proposed annexation territory.
(B) Any person who signs a petition must indicate the
address of the property owned by the person in the
annexation territory.
(6) Blank petition forms may be circulated to landowners by
mail. If the annexation is under section 5, 5.1, or 5.5 of this
chapter, the municipality (if the annexation is under section
5.5 of this chapter) or landowners (if the annexation is under
section 5 or 5.1 of this chapter) may mail with the petition any
additional information considered necessary. If the
annexation is under section 5.5 of this chapter, the
information may include notification of the last date that the
municipality may receive signed petitions in order to meet the
deadline for submitting the petition to the court under section
5.5(f) of this chapter.
(7) A signed petition form may be submitted directly to the
municipality in person or by mail or signed petition forms
may be collected and submitted to the municipality in person
or by mail.
(d) This subsection applies to an annexation under section 5.5 of
this chapter. The state board of accounts shall design a form for a
petition that is circulated in person by a representative of the
annexing municipality for an annexation under section 5.5 of this
chapter. The petition form must include the following:
(1) Multiple signature lines on each page. On each page where
signatures are affixed the petition must have a heading that is
substantially similar to the following:
"PETITION FOR ANNEXATION INTO THE (insert
whether city or town) OF (insert name of city or town).".
(2) The petition must include a space for each signer to enter
the address of the property owned by the signer in the
annexation territory.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(3) The petition must include a certificate for the carrier to
swear or affirm before a notary public that the carrier
witnessed each signature affixed to the petition.
(4) The petition must include or be accompanied by the
following instructions:
(A) The person who signs the petition must be an owner of
property in the proposed annexation territory.
(B) The carrier must inform the signer that the carrier
represents the annexing municipality.
(C) A person signing a petition must put the address of the
property owned by the person in the annexation territory
on the petition.
(D) After collecting the signatures, the carrier must swear
or affirm before a notary public that the carrier witnessed
each person sign the petition.
SECTION 7. IC 36-4-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.149-2016,
SECTION 96, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. (a) This subsection applies only to a
petition requesting annexation that is filed before July 1, 2015. If the
owners of land located outside of but contiguous to a municipality want
to have territory containing that land annexed to the municipality, they
may file with the legislative body of the municipality a petition:
(1) signed by at least:
(A) fifty-one percent (51%) of the owners of land in the
territory sought to be annexed; or
(B) the owners of seventy-five percent (75%) of the total
assessed value of the land for property tax purposes; and
(2) requesting an ordinance annexing the area described in the
petition.
(b) (a) This subsection applies only to a petition requesting
annexation that is filed after June 30, 2015. A municipality may not
collect signatures on an annexation petition that is filed with the
legislative body under this section after March 29, 2026. If the
owners of land located outside of but contiguous to a municipality want
to have territory containing that land annexed to the municipality, they
may file with the legislative body of the municipality a petition that
meets the following requirements:
(1) The petition is signed by at least one (1) of the following:
(A) Fifty-one percent (51%) of the owners of land in the
territory sought to be annexed. An owner of land may not:
(i) be counted in calculating the total number of owners of
land in the annexation territory; or
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(ii) have the owner's signature counted;
with regard to any single property that the owner has an
interest in that was exempt from property taxes under
IC 6-1.1-10 or any other state law for the immediately
preceding year.
(B) The owners of seventy-five percent (75%) of the total
assessed value of the land for property tax purposes. Land that
was exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any
other state law for the immediately preceding year may not be
included in calculating the total assessed valuation of the land
in the annexation territory. The court may not count an owner's
signature on a petition with regard to any single property that
the owner has an interest in that was exempt from property
taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any other state law for the
immediately preceding year.
(2) The petition requests an ordinance annexing the area
described in the petition.
(c) (b) The petition circulated by the landowners must include on
each page where signatures are affixed a heading that is substantially
similar to the following: "PETITION FOR ANNEXATION INTO THE
(insert whether city or town) OF (insert name of city or town).". meet
the requirements of section 4.7 of this chapter.
(d) (c) If the legislative body fails to pass the ordinance within one
hundred fifty (150) days after the date of filing of a petition under
subsection (a), or (b), the petitioners may file a duplicate copy of the
petition in the circuit or superior court of a county in which the territory
is located, and shall include a written statement of why the annexation
should take place. Notice of the proceedings, in the form of a
summons, shall be served on the municipality named in the petition.
The municipality is the defendant in the cause and shall appear and
answer.
(e) (d) The court shall hear and determine the petition without a
jury, and shall order the proposed annexation to take place only if the
evidence introduced by the parties establishes that:
(1) essential municipal services and facilities are not available to
the residents of the territory sought to be annexed;
(2) the municipality is physically and financially able to provide
municipal services to the territory sought to be annexed;
(3) the population density of the territory sought to be annexed is
at least three (3) persons per acre; and
(4) the territory sought to be annexed is contiguous to the
municipality.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


If the evidence does not establish all four (4) of the preceding factors,
the court shall deny the petition and dismiss the proceeding.
(f) (e) This subsection does not apply to a town that has abolished
town legislative body districts under IC 36-5-2-4.1. An ordinance
adopted under this section must assign the territory annexed by the
ordinance to at least one (1) municipal legislative body district.
SECTION 8. IC 36-4-3-5.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.160-2020,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5.1. (a) Owners of land that This section
applies to an annexation that meets one (1) of the following
requirements:
(1) The land that is the subject of the annexation is located
outside of but contiguous to a municipality. or that is
(2) The land that is the subject of the annexation is located in
territory described in section sections 4(i) and 5.2 of this chapter.
(3) The:
(A) land that is the subject of the annexation:
(i) is not contiguous to the municipality;
(ii) has its entire area not more than two (2) miles from
the municipality's boundary; and
(iii) is to be used for the development, singly or in
combination, of businesses, industrial enterprises,
multi-family dwellings, or at least fifty (50) single family
dwellings; and
(B) municipality has entered into a written agreement with
the owner of the land for the municipal utility to provide
to the owner as a customer of the utility, at least one (1) of
the following services:
(i) Gas.
(ii) Electric.
(iii) Water.
(iv) Sewer.
(b) The owners of the land may file a petition with the legislative
body of the municipality:
(1) requesting an ordinance annexing the area described in the
petition; and
(2) signed by (A) one hundred percent (100%) of the landowners
that reside within the territory that is proposed to be annexed, in
the case of a petition filed before July 1, 2015; and (B) in the case
of a petition filed after June 30, 2015, one hundred percent
(100%) of the owners of land within the territory that is proposed
to be annexed.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(b) (c) Sections 2.1 and 2.2 of this chapter do not apply to an
annexation under this section.
(c) (d) The petition circulated by the landowners must include on
each page where signatures are affixed a heading that is substantially
similar to the following:
"PETITION FOR ANNEXATION INTO THE (insert whether city
or town) OF (insert name of city or town).". meet the requirements of
section 4.7 of this chapter.
(d) (e) This subsection applies only to an annexation under
subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2). The municipality may (1) adopt an
annexation ordinance annexing the territory and (2) adopt a fiscal plan
and establish a definite policy by resolution of the legislative body;
after the legislative body has held a public hearing under subsection
(g) on the proposed annexation.
(f) This subsection applies only to an annexation under
subsection (a)(3). The municipality shall adopt a fiscal plan and
resolution under section 3.1 of this chapter, and an annexation
ordinance. The municipality shall file the annexation ordinance,
fiscal plan, and resolution with the county executive of each county
in which the annexation territory is located not earlier than fifteen
(15) days after the public hearing under subsection (g). Not later
than thirty (30) days after the filing, the county executive shall hold
a public hearing, providing notice under IC 5-3-1, to adopt a
resolution to approve or deny the proposed annexation. The
annexation:
(1) may only proceed if at least a majority of the members of
each county executive body adopts a resolution to approve the
annexation; or
(2) is terminated, if:
(A) at least a majority of the members of each county
executive body adopts a resolution to deny the annexation;
or
(B) any county executive in which the territory is located
fails to adopt a resolution approving or denying the
annexation not later than sixty (60) days after the
annexation is filed with the county executive.
If the annexation is terminated under subdivision (2), the
annexation ordinance adopted by the municipality is void and of no
effect.
(e) (g) The municipality may introduce and hold the public hearing
on the annexation ordinance not later than thirty (30) ninety (90) days
after the petition is filed with the legislative body. Notice of the public
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


hearing may be published one (1) time in accordance with IC 5-3-1 at
least twenty (20) days before the hearing. All interested parties must
have the opportunity to testify at the hearing as to the proposed
annexation.
(f) (h) The municipality may adopt the annexation ordinance not
earlier than fourteen (14) days after the public hearing under subsection
(e). (g).
(g) (i) A landowner may withdraw the landowner's signature from
the petition not more than thirteen (13) days after the municipality
adopts the fiscal plan date of the public hearing under subsection (g)
by providing written notice to the office of the clerk of the
municipality. If a landowner withdraws the landowner's signature, the
petition shall automatically be considered a voluntary petition that is
filed with the legislative body under section 5 of this chapter, fourteen
(14) days after the date the fiscal plan is adopted. of the public
hearing under subsection (g). All provisions applicable to a petition
initiated under section 5 of this chapter apply to the petition.
(h) (j) If the municipality does not adopt an annexation ordinance
within sixty (60) one hundred twenty (120) days after the landowners
file the petition with the legislative body, the landowners may file a
duplicate petition with the circuit or superior court of a county in which
the territory is located. The court shall determine whether the
annexation shall take place, as set forth in section 5 of this chapter.
providing a written statement of why the annexation should take
place. Notice of the proceedings, in the form of a summons, shall be
served on the municipality named in the petition. The municipality
is the defendant in the cause and shall appear and answer. The
court shall hear and determine the petition without a jury, and
shall order the proposed annexation to take place only if the
evidence introduced by the parties establishes the following:
(1) This subdivision applies only to an annexation under
subsection (a)(1). The evidence must establish the factors set
forth in section 5(d) of this chapter or the court shall deny the
petition and dismiss the proceeding.
(2) This subdivision applies only to an annexation under
subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3). The evidence must establish that:
(A) essential municipal services and facilities are not
available to the residents of the territory sought to be
annexed; and
(B) the municipality is physically and financially able to
provide municipal services to the territory sought to be
annexed.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


The evidence must establish both of the preceding factors or
the court shall deny the petition and dismiss the proceeding.
(i) A remonstrance under section 11 of this chapter may not be filed.
However, an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter may be filed.
(j) In the absence of an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter, an
annexation ordinance adopted under this section takes effect not less
than thirty (30) days after the adoption of the ordinance and upon the
filing and recording of the ordinance under section 22 of this chapter.
(k) This subsection applies only to territory annexed under
subsection (a)(3). The annexed territory may not be considered a
part of the municipality for purposes of annexing additional
territory under section 3, 4, or 5.5 of this chapter. However, the
territory shall be considered a part of the municipality for
purposes of annexing additional contiguous territory under this
section or section 5 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 36-4-3-5.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.211-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5.2. (a) As used in this section, "homeowners
association" means a corporation that satisfies all of the following:
(1) The corporation is exempt from federal income taxation under
26 U.S.C. 528.
(2) The control and management of the corporation is vested in a
board of directors.
(3) The corporation is organized and operated exclusively for the
benefit of two (2) or more persons who each own:
(A) a dwelling in fee simple; or
(B) a commercial building in fee simple;
within the residential development.
(4) The purpose of the corporation is to:
(A) own, maintain, and operate common areas and facilities;
(B) administer and enforce covenants and restrictions on
property; and
(C) collect and distribute assessments on property;
located within the residential development.
(5) The corporation acts in accordance with the articles, bylaws,
or other documents governing the corporation to:
(A) adopt and enforce rules and regulations necessary for the
enjoyment of common areas, recreation facilities, and other
amenities located within the residential development; and
(B) exercise the corporation's power to:
(i) levy assessments on property within the residential
development; and
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(ii) collect assessments on property located within the
residential development by enforcing the corporation's lien
and foreclosure rights.
(b) As used in this section, "municipality" means:
(1) a third class city; or
(2) a town having a population of more than thirty thousand
(30,000) located in a county having a population of more than one
hundred seventy-four thousand (174,000) and less than one
hundred eighty thousand (180,000).
(c) As used in this section, "residential development" means a parcel
of land that is subdivided or will be subdivided upon collection of the
annexation into:
(1) lots, parcels, tracts, units, or interests that:
(A) include an existing Class 2 structure (as defined in
IC 22-12-1-5); or
(B) are designated for the construction of a Class 2 structure;
each of which is encumbered by substantively identical restrictive
covenants concerning one (1) or more servient estates located
within the boundaries of the original undivided parcel, or other
governing document of record;
(2) lots, parcels, tracts, units, or interests that:
(A) include an existing Class 1 structure (as defined in
IC 22-12-1-4); or
(B) are designated for the construction of a Class 1 structure;
and
(3) a common area.
(d) In addition to annexing territory under section 3, 4, 5, or 5.1 of
this chapter, a third class city may annex a residential development and
a public highway right-of-way that connects the residential
development to the corporate limits of the third class city. A town
described in subsection (b)(2) may annex a residential development.
An annexation by a third class city or a town under this section must
satisfy the following:
(1) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a
municipality. The residential development is governed by a
homeowners association.
(2) The residential development has at least any combination of:
(A) three hundred (300) proposed or existing, or both, single
family lots within the proposed or existing residential
developments, in the case of an annexation by a third class
city; or
(B) five hundred (500) proposed or existing, or both, single
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


family lots within the proposed or existing residential
developments, in the case of an annexation by a town
described in subsection (b)(2).
(3) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a
municipality. The residential development is located in its entirety
not more than four and five-tenths (4.5) miles outside the
municipality's corporate boundaries.
(4) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a third class
city. The residential development dwellings are or will be upon
construction connected to the third class city's sewer or water
service.
(5) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a
municipality. The residential development includes a commercial
area containing or proposed to contain buildings intended to be
used and operated for commercial purposes.
(6) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a third class
city. The residential development is adjacent to the public
highway right-of-way.
(7) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a third class
city. The public highway that connects the residential
development to the corporate limits of the city is part of the state
highway system (as defined in IC 8-23-1-40).
(8) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a third class
city. The city's annexation territory includes only the public
highway right-of-way and the residential development.
(9) The aggregate external boundary of the annexation territory
that coincides with the boundary of the third class city is greater
than zero (0).
(10) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a town
described in subsection (b)(2). An existing sewer line extends
from the residential development to the corporate limits of the
town. The residential development is or will be upon construction
connected to the town's sewer and water service.
(11) This subdivision applies only to an annexation by a town
described in subsection (b)(2). The cost of construction of the
residential development is at least five hundred million dollars
($500,000,000).
(12) The aggregate external boundary of the annexation territory
that coincides with the boundary of the town described in
subsection (b)(2) is zero (0).
(e) Unless the articles, bylaws, or other governing documents of the
homeowners association expressly provide otherwise, the board of
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


directors of the homeowners association may file a petition with the
legislative body of the municipality requesting the municipality to
annex all property within the residential development. The annexation
may proceed only if the municipality adopts a resolution approving the
initiation of the annexation process not more than sixty (60) days after
the petition is filed. If the municipality does not adopt a resolution
within the sixty (60) day period, the petition is void.
(f) If the legislative body of the municipality adopts a resolution
approving initiation of the annexation, the municipality shall prepare
a written preliminary fiscal plan that must be made available to the
public at each of the outreach program meetings under section 1.7 of
this chapter.
(g) Upon completion of the outreach program meetings and before
mailing the notification to landowners under section 2.2 of this chapter,
the legislative body of the municipality shall adopt a written fiscal plan
by resolution that incorporates any revisions to the preliminary fiscal
plan.
(h) The municipality shall hold a public hearing not earlier than
thirty (30) days after the date the annexation ordinance is introduced.
All interested parties must have the opportunity to testify as to the
proposed annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be:
(1) published in accordance with IC 5-3-1 except that the notice
shall be published at least thirty (30) days before the hearing; and
(2) mailed as set forth in section 2.2 of this chapter.
A municipality may adopt an ordinance not earlier than thirty (30) days
or not later than sixty (60) days after the legislative body of the
municipality has held the public hearing under this subsection.
(i) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which a
written fiscal plan was adopted before March 30, 2026. A
landowner may file a remonstrance against the annexation as provided
in section 11 of this chapter.
(j) Territory annexed under this section may not be considered a part
of the third class city for purposes of annexing additional territory
under section 3 or 4 of this chapter. However, territory annexed under
this chapter shall be considered a part of the third class city for
purposes of annexing additional contiguous territory under section 5
or 5.1 of this chapter.
(k) For purposes of an annexation by a third class city under this
section:
(1) section 1.5 of this chapter does not apply; and
(2) the landowner of the public highway right-of-way that is part
of the state highway system (as defined in IC 8-23-1-40) is
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


considered to be the state of Indiana.
(l) The redevelopment commission of a town described in
subsection (b)(2) may only enact a housing tax increment financing
district in Liberty Township in Hendricks County if the housing tax
increment financing district is approved by a resolution passed by the
Mill Creek School Corporation.
(m) The following apply only to an annexation by a town described
in subsection (b)(2):
(1) Any territory that is annexed under this section may not be
considered a part of the town for purposes of annexing additional
territory under section 3 or 4 of this chapter. However, any part of
the unincorporated area (including any property occupied by the
sewer line under subsection (d)(10)) that:
(A) adjoins the boundaries of the annexation territory; and
(B) extends one-half (1/2) mile from the boundaries of the
annexation territory;
may only be annexed by the town if the annexation is under
section 5.1 of this chapter.
(2) Any part of the unincorporated area (including any property
occupied by the sewer line under subsection (d)(10)) that extends:
(A) outside the one-half (1/2) mile area described in
subdivision (1); and
(B) to the corporate limits of the town;
is not a part of the annexation territory or the town for purposes
of annexing additional territory under this chapter.
SECTION 10. IC 36-4-3-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5.5. (a) This section does not apply to an
annexation under section 5, 5.1, or 5.2 of this chapter.
(b) This section applies only to an annexation for which a
written fiscal plan is adopted after March 29, 2026.
(c) After adopting an annexation ordinance under section 3 or
4 of this chapter, in order for the annexation to proceed, the
municipality must file a written petition under subsection (f) signed
by owners of land in the territory proposed to be annexed who are
in favor of the annexation. The petition must be signed by:
(1) at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the owners of land:
(A) not exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or
any other state law; and
(B) in the territory proposed to be annexed; or
(2) the owners of more than seventy-five percent (75%) in
assessed valuation of land:
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(A) not exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or
any other state law; and
(B) in the territory proposed to be annexed.
(d) The petition circulated by the municipality must meet the
requirements of section 4.7 of this chapter.
(e) A landowner may withdraw the landowner's signature from
the petition not more than ten (10) days after the municipality
adopts the annexation ordinance by providing written notice to the
office of the clerk of the municipality. A landowner who withdraws
the landowner's signature from the petition is considered not to
have signed the petition for purposes of subsection (h)(2).
(f) The municipality must file the petition with the circuit or
superior court of the county where the municipality is located not
later than ninety (90) days after the publication of the annexation
ordinance under section 7 of this chapter. The petition must be
accompanied by:
(1) a copy of the ordinance; and
(2) the names and addresses of all persons who meet the
requirements of subsection (h).
(g) On receipt of the petition, the court shall determine whether
the petition has the necessary signatures. In determining the total
number of landowners of the territory proposed to be annexed and
whether signers of the petition are landowners, the names
appearing on the tax duplicate for that territory constitute prima
facie evidence of ownership. Only one (1) person having an interest
in each single property, as evidenced by the tax duplicate, is
considered a landowner for purposes of this section. A person is
entitled to sign a petition only one (1) time, regardless of whether
the person owns more than one (1) parcel of real property. If the
court determines that the municipality's petition has a sufficient
number of signatures, the court shall fix a time, not later than sixty
(60) days after its determination, for a public hearing on the
petition.
(h) A person may intervene as a party at the hearing described
in subsection (g) if the following requirements are satisfied:
(1) The person owns, solely or with another person, property
that is in the territory proposed to be annexed.
(2) None of the owners of the property signed the petition filed
by the municipality.
(3) The person appeared in person or submitted a
remonstrance or other document objecting to the annexation
into the record of the municipality's public hearing on the
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


annexation ordinance under section 2.1 of this chapter.
The court shall give a person described in this subsection notice of
the public hearing on the petition by certified mail.
SECTION 11. IC 36-4-3-5.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5.6. (a) This section does not apply to an
annexation under section 5, 5.1, or 5.2 of this chapter for which the
written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026.
(b) If, with regard to a signature on a petition for annexation
under section 5, 5.1, or 5.5 of this chapter:
(1) the validity of a signature is uncertain; and
(2) this section does not establish a standard to be applied in
the case;
a reasonable doubt must be resolved in favor of the validity of the
signature.
(c) Whenever the name of an individual, as printed or signed,
contains a minor variation from the name of the individual as set
forth in the relevant county records, the signature is considered
valid.
(d) Whenever the residence address or mailing address of an
individual contains a minor variation from the residence address
or mailing address as set forth in the relevant county records, the
signature is considered valid.
(e) If the residence address or mailing address of an individual
contains a substantial variation from the residence address or
mailing address as set forth in the relevant county records, the
signature is considered invalid.
(f) If the signature of an individual does not substantially
conform with the signature of the individual as set forth in the
relevant county records, the signature is considered invalid. In
determining whether a signature substantially conforms with the
signature in the relevant county records, consideration shall be
given to whether that lack of conformity may reasonably be
attributed to the age, disability, or impairment of the individual.
SECTION 12. IC 36-4-3-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 235, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) After an ordinance is
adopted under section 3, 4, 5, 5.1, or 5.2, or 5.5 of this chapter, it must
be published in the manner prescribed by IC 5-3-1. Except as provided
in subsection (b), (c), (d), or (e), in the absence of a remonstrance and
appeal under section 11 or 15.5 of this chapter or an appeal under
section 15.5 of this chapter, the ordinance takes effect at least ninety
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(90) days after its publication and upon the filing required by section
22(a) of this chapter.
(b) An annexation ordinance takes effect as follows:
(1) This subdivision applies to an annexation under section 5
of this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (d), in the
absence of an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter, the
annexation ordinance takes effect at least ninety (90) days
after its publication and upon the filing required under
section 22(a) of this chapter.
(2) This subdivision applies to an annexation under section 5.1
of this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (d), in the
absence of an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter, the
ordinance takes effect at least thirty (30) days after the
adoption of the ordinance and upon the filing required under
section 22(a) of this chapter.
(3) This subdivision applies to an annexation under section 5.5
of this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (d), if a final
and unappealable judgment under section 12 or 15.5 of this
chapter is entered in favor of the annexation, the annexation
is effective upon the filing required under section 22(a) of this
chapter.
(4) This subdivision applies to an annexation under section
7.1(c) of this chapter. Except as provided in subsection (d), if
a final and unappealable judgment under section 12 or 15.5 of
this chapter is entered in favor of the annexation, the
annexation is effective upon the filing required under section
22(a) of this chapter.
(5) This subdivision applies to an annexation under section 7.2
of this chapter. In the absence of an appeal under section 15.5
of this chapter, the annexation ordinance takes effect at least
thirty (30) days after its publication and upon the filing
required under section 22(a) of this chapter.
(b) (c) For the purposes of this section, territory that has been:
(1) added to an existing fire protection district under
IC 36-8-11-11; or
(2) approved by ordinance of the county legislative body to be
added to an existing fire protection district under IC 36-8-11-11,
notwithstanding that the territory's addition to the fire protection
district has not yet taken effect;
shall be considered a part of the fire protection district as of the date
that the fire protection district was originally established.
(c) (d) This subsection applies only to a fire protection district
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


established after July 1, 1987. This subsection does not apply to an
annexation under subsection (f). Whenever a municipality annexes
territory, all or part of which lies within a fire protection district (IC
36-8-11), the annexation ordinance in the absence of:
(1) a remonstrance and appeal under section 11 or 15.5 of this
chapter; or
(2) an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter;
takes effect the second January 1 that follows the date the ordinance is
adopted and upon the filing required by section 22(a) of this chapter.
The municipality shall (1) provide fire protection to that territory
beginning the date the ordinance is effective and (2) send written notice
to the fire protection district of the date the municipality will begin to
provide fire protection to the annexed territory within ten (10) days of
the date the ordinance is adopted.
(d) (e) This subsection applies only to a fire protection district
established after July 1, 1987. This subsection does not apply to an
annexation under subsection (f). If the fire protection district from
which a municipality annexes territory is indebted or has outstanding
unpaid bonds or other obligations at the time the annexation is
effective, the municipality is liable for and shall pay that indebtedness
in the same ratio as the assessed valuation of the property in the
annexed territory (that is part of the fire protection district) bears to the
assessed valuation of all property in the fire protection district, as
shown by the most recent assessment for taxation before the
annexation, unless the assessed property within the municipality is
already liable for the indebtedness. The annexing municipality shall
pay its indebtedness under this section to the board of fire trustees. If
the indebtedness consists of outstanding unpaid bonds or notes of the
fire protection district, the payments to the board of fire trustees shall
be made as the principal or interest on the bonds or notes becomes due.
(e) This subsection applies to an annexation initiated by property
owners under section 5.1 of this chapter in which all property owners
within the area to be annexed petition the municipality to be annexed.
Subject to subsection (c), and in the absence of an appeal under section
15.5 of this chapter, an annexation ordinance takes effect at least thirty
(30) days after its publication and upon the filing required by section
22(a) of this chapter.
(f) Whenever a municipality annexes territory that lies within a fire
protection district that has a total net assessed value (as determined by
the county auditor) of more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000)
on the date the annexation ordinance is adopted:
(1) the annexed area shall remain a part of the fire protection
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


district after the annexation takes effect; and
(2) the fire protection district shall continue to provide fire
protection services to the annexed area.
The municipality shall not tax the annexed territory for fire protection
services. The annexing municipality shall establish a special fire fund
for all fire protection services that are provided by the municipality
within the area of the municipality that is not within the fire protection
district, and which shall not be assessed to the annexed special taxing
district. The annexed territory that lies within the fire protection district
shall continue to be part of the fire protection district special taxing
district.
SECTION 13. IC 36-4-3-7.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
SECTION 156, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.1. (a) This section applies to
an annexation ordinance:
(1) adopted under section 4 or 5.1 of this chapter; and
(2) that meets all of the following conditions:
(A) The annexed territory has no population.
(B) Ninety percent (90%) of the total assessed value of the
land for property tax purposes has one (1) owner.
(C) The annexation is required to fulfill an economic
development incentive package and to retain an industry
through various local incentives, including urban
enterprise zone benefits.
(b) An:
(1) annexation:
(A) under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this
chapter; and
(B) for which an annexation ordinance is adopted before
March 30, 2026; or
(2) annexation:
(A) under section 4 of this chapter (excluding an
annexation under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of
this chapter) or section 5.1 of this chapter; and
(B) for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before March
30, 2026;
takes effect immediately upon the expiration of the remonstrance and
appeal period under section 11 11.1, or 15.5 of this chapter and after
the publication, filing, and recording required by section 22(a) of this
chapter. if all of the following conditions are met:
(1) The annexed territory has no population.
(2) Ninety percent (90%) of the total assessed value of the land
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


for property tax purposes has one (1) owner.
(3) The annexation is required to fulfill an economic development
incentive package and to retain an industry through various local
incentives, including urban enterprise zone benefits.
(c) In an annexation:
(1) under section 4 of this chapter (including an annexation
under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter) or
section 5.1 or this chapter; and
(2) for which a written fiscal plan is not adopted before March
30, 2026;
the annexation ordinance takes effect as set forth in section 7(b)(4)
of this chapter.
SECTION 14. IC 36-4-3-7.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 236, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.2. (a) This section applies to
an annexation that satisfies all of the following:
(1) The annexation ordinance is adopted after December 31,
2020.
(2) The annexation is initiated by property owners under section
5.1 of this chapter in which all property owners within the
annexation territory petition the municipality to be annexed.
(3) All or part of the annexation territory is within a fire
protection district that was established after July 1, 1987.
(4) At least a majority of the members of the board of trustees of
the fire protection district adopt a resolution consenting to the
annexation.
(5) The portion of the annexation territory located within the fire
protection district constitutes less than three percent (3%) of the
total net assessed value (as determined by the county auditor) of
the fire protection district on the date the annexation ordinance is
adopted.
(b) Section 7(b) 7(c) and 7(d) 7(e) of this chapter apply to an
annexation under this section.
(c) Section 7(a), 7(c), 7(e), 7(b), 7(d), and 7(f) of this chapter do not
apply to an annexation under this section.
(d) After an annexation ordinance is adopted, the ordinance must be
published in the manner prescribed by IC 5-3-1. In the absence of an
appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter, the annexation ordinance
takes effect at least thirty (30) days after its publication and upon the
filing required by section 22(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 15. IC 36-4-3-7.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.79-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7.3. (a) This section applies to an annexation
that satisfies all of the following:
(1) The annexation ordinance is adopted on October 7, 2024.
(2) The annexation territory does not exceed fifty (50) acres.
(3) All or part of the annexation territory is within a fire
protection district established after July 1, 1987.
(4) The annexation territory consists of vacant land except for not
more than one (1) residential property.
(b) Section 7(b) 7(c) and 7(d) 7(e) of this chapter apply to an
annexation under this section.
(c) Section 7(a), 7(c), 7(e), 7(b), 7(d), and 7(f) of this chapter do not
apply to an annexation under this section.
(d) After an annexation ordinance is adopted, the ordinance must be
published in the manner prescribed by IC 5-3-1. In the absence of an
appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter, the annexation ordinance
takes effect at least thirty (30) days after its publication and upon the
filing required by section 22(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 16. IC 36-4-3-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2016,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11. (a) This subsection applies only to an
annexation for which an annexation ordinance was adopted before July
1, 2015. Except as provided in section 5.1(i) of this chapter and
subsections (e) and (f), whenever territory is annexed by a municipality
under this chapter, the annexation may be appealed by filing with the
circuit or superior court of a county in which the annexed territory is
located a written remonstrance signed by:
(1) at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the owners of land in the
annexed territory; or
(2) the owners of more than seventy-five percent (75%) in
assessed valuation of the land in the annexed territory.
The remonstrance must be filed within ninety (90) days after the
publication of the annexation ordinance under section 7 of this chapter,
must be accompanied by a copy of that ordinance, and must state the
reason why the annexation should not take place.
(b) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance was adopted before July 1, 2015. On receipt of
the remonstrance, the court shall determine whether the remonstrance
has the necessary signatures. In determining the total number of
landowners of the annexed territory and whether signers of the
remonstrance are landowners, the names appearing on the tax duplicate
for that territory constitute prima facie evidence of ownership. Only
one (1) person having an interest in each single property, as evidenced
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


by the tax duplicate, is considered a landowner for purposes of this
section.
(c) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance was adopted before July 1, 2015. If the court
determines that the remonstrance is sufficient, the court shall fix a time,
within sixty (60) days after the court's determination, for a hearing on
the remonstrance. Notice of the proceedings, in the form of a summons,
shall be served on the annexing municipality. The municipality is the
defendant in the cause and shall appear and answer.
(d) (a) This subsection section applies only to an annexation for
which an annexation ordinance was adopted after June 30, 2015. under
section 3, 4, or 5.2 of this chapter (excluding an annexation under
section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter) for which a
written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026.
(b) If the requirements of section 11.3(c) or (after December 31,
2016) section 11.4 of this chapter are met, the annexation may be
appealed by filing with the circuit or superior court of a county in
which the annexed territory is located:
(1) the signed remonstrances filed with the county auditor;
(2) the county auditor's certification under section 11.2(i) of this
chapter;
(3) the annexation ordinance; and
(4) a statement of the reason why the annexation should not take
place.
The remonstrance must be filed with the court not later than fifteen
(15) business days after the date the county auditor files the certificate
with the legislative body under section 11.2(i) of this chapter. After a
remonstrance petition is filed with the court, any person who signed a
remonstrance may file with the court a verified, written revocation of
the person's opposition to the annexation.
(e) If an annexation is initiated by property owners under section 5.1
of this chapter and all property owners within the area to be annexed
petition the municipality to be annexed, a remonstrance to the
annexation may not be filed under this section.
(f) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance is adopted before July 1, 2015. This subsection
applies if:
(1) the territory to be annexed consists of not more than one
hundred (100) parcels; and
(2) eighty percent (80%) of the boundary of the territory proposed
to be annexed is contiguous to the municipality.
An annexation may be appealed by filing with the circuit or superior
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


court of a county in which the annexed territory is located a written
remonstrance signed by at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the
owners of land in the annexed territory as determined under subsection
(b).
SECTION 17. IC 36-4-3-11.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.228-2015,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.1. (a) This section applies only to an
annexation ordinance adopted after June 30, 2015. under section 3, 4,
or 5.2 of this chapter (excluding an annexation under section
4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter) for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026.
(b) After a municipality adopts an annexation ordinance in
accordance with all applicable notice and hearing requirements under
this chapter, the annexation may not proceed unless the annexing
municipality completes the procedures set forth in this section.
(c) The proper officers of the municipality must give notice of the
applicability of the remonstrance process by providing notice by:
(1) publication in accordance with IC 5-3-1; and
(2) first class mail or certified mail with return receipt requested,
or any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt;
to the circuit court clerk and to owners of real property described in
section 2.2 of this chapter. Notice under this section must be published
and mailed or delivered on the same date that notice of the adoption of
the annexation ordinance is published under section 7 of this chapter.
(d) The notice of the applicability of the remonstrance process under
subsection (c) must state the following:
(1) Any owners of real property within the area proposed to be
annexed who want to remonstrate against the proposed
annexation must complete and file remonstrance petitions in
compliance with this chapter. The notice must state:
(A) that remonstrance petitions must be filed not later than
ninety (90) days after the date that notice of the adoption of the
annexation ordinance was published under section 7 of this
chapter; and
(B) the last date in accordance with clause (A) that
remonstrance petitions must be filed with the county auditor
to be valid.
(2) A remonstrance petition may be signed at the locations
provided by the municipality under subsection (e). The notice
must provide the following information regarding each location:
(A) The address of the location.
(B) The dates and hours during which a remonstrance petition
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


may be signed at the location.
(e) Beginning the day after publication of the notice under
subsection (c) and ending not later than ninety (90) days after
publication of the notice under subsection (c), the municipality shall
provide both of the following:
(1) At least one (1) location in the offices of the municipality
where a person may sign a remonstrance petition during regular
business hours.
(2) At least one (1) additional location that is available for at least
five (5) days, where a person may sign a remonstrance petition.
The location must meet the following requirements:
(A) The location must be in a public building:
(i) owned or leased by the state or a political subdivision,
including a public library, community center, or parks and
recreation building; and
(ii) located within the boundaries of the municipality or the
annexation territory.
(B) The location must be open according to the following:
(i) On a day that the location is open on a weekday, the
location must be open at a minimum from 5 p.m. to 9 p.m.
(ii) On a day that the location is open on a Saturday or
Sunday, the location must be open at least four (4) hours
during the period from 9 a.m. to 5 p.m.
(f) An additional location may not be open on a day that is a legal
holiday. At any location and during the hours that a remonstrance
petition may be signed, the municipality shall have a person present:
(1) to witness the signing of remonstrance petitions; and
(2) who shall swear and affirm before a notary public that the
person witnessed each person sign the remonstrance petition.
SECTION 18. IC 36-4-3-11.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2016,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.2. (a) This section applies only to an
annexation ordinance adopted after June 30, 2015. under section 3, 4,
or 5.2 of this chapter (excluding an annexation under section
4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter) for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026.
(b) A remonstrance petition may be filed by an owner of real
property that:
(1) is within the area to be annexed;
(2) was not exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any
other state law for the immediately preceding year; and
(3) is not subject to a valid waiver of remonstrance.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(c) A remonstrance petition must comply with the following in order
to be effective:
(1) Each signature on a remonstrance petition must be dated, and
the date of the signature may not be earlier than the date on which
the remonstrance forms may be issued by the county auditor
under subsection (e)(7).
(2) Each person who signs a remonstrance petition must indicate
the address of the real property owned by the person in the area
to be annexed.
(3) A remonstrance petition must be verified in compliance with
subsection (e).
(d) The state board of accounts shall design the remonstrance forms
to be used solely in the remonstrance process described in this section.
The state board of accounts shall provide the forms to the county
auditor in an electronic format that permits the county auditor to copy
or reproduce the forms using:
(1) the county auditor's own equipment; or
(2) a commercial copying service.
The annexing municipality shall reimburse the county auditor for the
cost of reproducing the remonstrance forms.
(e) The county auditor's office shall issue remonstrance forms
accompanied by instructions detailing all of the following
requirements:
(1) The closing date for the remonstrance period.
(2) Only one (1) person having an interest in each single property
as evidenced by the tax duplicate is considered an owner of
property and may sign a remonstrance petition. A person is
entitled to sign a petition only one (1) time in a remonstrance
process, regardless of whether the person owns more than one (1)
parcel of real property.
(3) An individual may not be:
(A) compensated for; or
(B) reimbursed for expenses incurred in;
circulating a remonstrance petition and obtaining signatures.
(4) The remonstrance petition may be executed in several
counterparts, the total of which constitutes the remonstrance
petition. An affidavit of the person circulating a counterpart must
be attached to the counterpart. The affidavit must state that each
signature appearing on the counterpart was affixed in the person's
presence and is the true and lawful signature of the signer. The
affidavit must be notarized.
(5) A remonstrance petition that is not executed in counterparts
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


must be verified by the person signing the petition in the manner
prescribed by the state board of accounts and notarized.
(6) A remonstrance petition may be delivered to the county
auditor's office in person or by:
(A) certified mail, return receipt requested; or
(B) any other means of delivery that includes a return receipt.
The remonstrance petition must be postmarked not later than the
closing date for the remonstrance period.
(7) The county auditor's office may not issue a remonstrance
petition earlier than the day that notice is published under section
11.1 of this chapter. The county auditor's office shall certify the
date of issuance on each remonstrance petition. Any person may
pick up additional copies of the remonstrance petition to
distribute to other persons.
(8) A person who signs a remonstrance petition may withdraw the
person's signature from a remonstrance petition before a
remonstrance petition is filed with the county auditor by filing a
verified request to remove the person's name from the
remonstrance petition. Names may not be added to a
remonstrance petition after the remonstrance petition is filed with
the county auditor.
(f) The county auditor shall prepare and update weekly a list of the
persons who have signed a remonstrance petition. The list must include
a statement that the list includes all persons who have signed a
remonstrance petition as of a particular date, and does not represent a
list of persons certified by the county auditor as actual landowners in
the annexation territory using the auditor's current tax records under
subsection (i). The county auditor shall post the list in the office of the
county auditor. The list is a public record under IC 5-14-3.
(g) Not later than five (5) business days after receiving the
remonstrance petition, the county auditor shall submit a copy of the
remonstrance petition to the legislative body of the annexing
municipality.
(h) Not later than fifteen (15) business days after the legislative
body of the annexing municipality receives a copy of the remonstrance
petition from the county auditor, the annexing municipality shall
provide documentation to the county auditor regarding any valid waiver
of the right of remonstrance that exists on the property within the
annexation territory.
(i) Not later than fifteen (15) business days after receiving the
documentation regarding any valid waiver of the right of remonstrance
from the annexing municipality under subsection (h), if any, the county
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


auditor's office shall make a final determination of the number of
owners of real property within the territory to be annexed:
(1) who signed the remonstrance; and
(2) whose property is not subject to a valid waiver of the right of
remonstrance;
using the auditor's current tax records as provided in section 2.2 of this
chapter. The county auditor shall file a certificate with the legislative
body of the annexing municipality certifying the number of property
owners not later than five (5) business days after making the
determination.
SECTION 19. IC 36-4-3-11.3, AS ADDED BY P.L.228-2015,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.3. (a) This section applies only to an
annexation ordinance adopted after June 30, 2015. under section 3, 4,
or 5.2 of this chapter (excluding an annexation under section
4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this chapter) for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026.
(b) An annexation ordinance is void if a written remonstrance
petition is signed by one (1) of the following:
(1) At least sixty-five percent (65%) of the owners of land in the
annexed territory. An owner of land may not:
(A) be counted in calculating the total number of owners of
land in the annexation territory; or
(B) have the owner's signature counted on a remonstrance;
with regard to any single property that an owner has an interest in
that was exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any
other state law for the immediately preceding year.
(2) The owners of at least eighty percent (80%) in assessed
valuation of the land in the annexed territory. Land that was
exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any other state
law for the immediately preceding year may not be included in
calculating the total assessed valuation of the land in the
annexation territory. The court may not count the owner's
signature on a remonstrance with regard to any single property
that the owner has an interest in that was exempt from property
taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any other state law for the immediately
preceding year.
(c) The annexation may be appealed to the court under section 11
of this chapter, if a written remonstrance is signed by one (1) of the
following:
(1) At least fifty-one percent (51%) but less than sixty-five
percent (65%) of the owners of land. An owner of land may not:
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(A) be counted in calculating the total number of owners of
land in the annexation territory; or
(B) have the owner's signature counted on a remonstrance;
with regard to any single property that the owner has an interest
in that was exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any
other state law for the immediately preceding year.
(2) The owners of at least sixty percent (60%) but less than eighty
percent (80%) in assessed valuation of land in the annexed
territory. Land that was exempt from property taxes under
IC 6-1.1-10 or any other state law for the immediately preceding
year may not be included in calculating the total assessed
valuation of the land in the annexation territory. The court may
not count an owner's signature on a remonstrance with regard to
any single property that the owner has an interest in that was
exempt from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10 or any other state
law for the immediately preceding year.
SECTION 20. IC 36-4-3-11.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 237, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.4. (a) This section applies
only to an annexation that meets all of the following requirements:
(1) The annexation ordinance is adopted after December 31,
2016. under section 3 or 4 of this chapter (excluding an
annexation under section 4(a)(2), 4(a)(3), 4(b), or 4(h) of this
chapter) for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before
March 30, 2026.
(2) Notwithstanding the contiguity requirements of section 1.5 of
this chapter, at least one-tenth (1/10) of the aggregate external
boundaries of the territory sought to be annexed coincides with
the boundaries of:
(A) the municipality; and
(B) the site of an economic development project.
(b) As used in this section, "economic development project" means
any project developed by the municipality that meets all of the
following requirements:
(1) The annexing municipality determines that the project will:
(A) promote significant opportunities for the gainful
employment of its citizens;
(B) attract a major new business enterprise to the municipality;
or
(C) retain or expand a significant business enterprise within
the municipality.
(2) The project involves expenditures by the annexing
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


municipality for any of the following:
(A) Land acquisition, interests in land, site improvements,
infrastructure improvements, buildings, or structures.
(B) Rehabilitation, renovation, and enlargement of buildings
and structures.
(C) Machinery, equipment, furnishings, or facilities.
(D) Substance removal or remedial action.
(c) Notwithstanding section 11.3(b) of this chapter, even if a
remonstrance has enough signatures to satisfy the requirements of
section 11.3(b) of this chapter, the annexation ordinance is not void and
may be appealed to the court under section 11 of this chapter, if all of
the following requirements are met:
(1) The economic development project site needs the following
capital services that the municipality is lawfully able to provide:
(A) water;
(B) sewer;
(C) gas; or
(D) any combination of the capital services described in
clauses (A) through (C).
(2) The municipality finds that it is in the municipality's best
interest to annex the annexation territory in order to extend,
construct, or operate the capital services that are provided to the
economic development project site.
(3) Before the date the annexation ordinance is adopted, a
taxpayer whose business will occupy the economic development
project site has done at least one (1) of the following:
(A) Filed a statement of benefits under IC 6-1.1-12.1 with the
designating body for the annexing municipality for a deduction
or abatement.
(B) Entered into an agreement with the Indiana economic
development corporation for a credit under IC 6-3.1-13.
(d) If the economic development project:
(1) has not commenced within twelve (12) months after the date
the annexation ordinance is adopted; or
(2) is not completed within thirty-six (36) months after the date
the annexation ordinance is adopted;
the annexation territory is disannexed from the municipality and reverts
to the jurisdiction of the unit having jurisdiction before the annexation.
For purposes of this subsection, an economic development project is
considered to have commenced on the day that the physical erection,
installation, alteration, repair, or remodeling of a building or structure
commences on the site of the economic development project.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


SECTION 21. IC 36-4-3-11.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.5. (a) A
landowner in an unincorporated area is not required to grant a
municipality a waiver against remonstrance as a condition of
connection to a sewer or water service if all of the following conditions
apply:
(1) The landowner is required to connect to the sewer or water
service because a person other than the landowner has polluted or
contaminated the area.
(2) A person other than the landowner or the municipality has
paid the cost of connection to the service.
(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a waiver against
remonstrance is effective and binding on a landowner or a
successor in title only with regard to an annexation for which a
written fiscal plan was adopted before March 30, 2026. A signed
remonstrance waiver may not be considered or counted as a valid
signature on a petition in favor of annexation under section 5, 5.1,
or 5.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 22. IC 36-4-3-11.6, AS ADDED BY P.L.228-2015,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.6. (a) This section applies to a
remonstrance filed after June 30, 2015. applies only to an annexation
for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026.
(b) If the court orders an annexation not to take place after a hearing
under section 11 of this chapter, the remonstrators shall be reimbursed
by the annexing municipality for any reasonable attorney's fees,
including litigation expenses and appeal costs:
(1) that are incurred:
(A) after the date the annexation ordinance is adopted; and
(B) in remonstrating against the annexation; and
(2) not to exceed thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars
($37,500).
SECTION 23. IC 36-4-3-11.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.257-2019,
SECTION 112, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 11.7. (a) This subsection
applies to any deed recorded after June 30, 2015. This subsection
applies only to property that is subject to a remonstrance waiver. A
municipality shall, within a reasonable time after the recording of a
deed to property located within the municipality, provide written notice
to the property owner that a waiver of the right of remonstrance exists
with respect to the property.
(b) A remonstrance waiver executed before July 1, 2003, is void.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(c) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2003, and before
July 1, 2019, is subject to the following:
(1) The waiver is void unless the waiver was recorded:
(A) before January 1, 2020; and
(B) with the county recorder of the county where the property
subject to the waiver is located.
(2) A waiver that is not void under subdivision (1) expires not
later than fifteen (15) years after the date the waiver is executed.
This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(d) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2019, is subject
to the following: (1) The waiver is void unless the waiver is must be
recorded (A) not later than thirty (30) business days after the date the
waiver was executed and (B) with the county recorder of the county
where the property subject to the waiver is located. (2) A waiver that
is not void under subdivision (1) expires not later than fifteen (15)
years after the date the waiver is executed. This subsection does not
invalidate an annexation that was effective on or before July 1, 2019.
(e) Notwithstanding any other law, a remonstrance waiver is
effective and binding on a landowner or a successor in title only
with regard to an annexation for which a written fiscal plan is
adopted before March 30, 2026. A signed remonstrance waiver
may not be considered or counted as a valid signature on a petition
in favor of annexation under section 5, 5.1, or 5.5 of this chapter.
SECTION 24. IC 36-4-3-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
SECTION 158, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 12. The circuit or superior court
shall:
(1) on the date fixed under:
(A) section 11 of this chapter (in the case of an annexation
for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30,
2026), hear and determine the remonstrance without a jury; or
(B) section 5.5 of this chapter (in the case of an annexation
for which a written fiscal plan is adopted after March 29,
2026), hear and determine the petition without a jury; and
(2) without delay, enter judgment on the question of the
annexation according to the evidence that either party may
introduce.
SECTION 25. IC 36-4-3-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.70-2022,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13. (a) Except as provided in subsection (e),
at the hearing under section 12 of this chapter, the court shall order a
proposed annexation to take place if the following requirements are
met:
(1) The requirements of either subsection (b) or (c).
(2) The requirements of subsection (d).
(3) The requirements of subsection (i) (in the case of an
annexation for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before
March 30, 2026).
(b) The requirements of this subsection are met if the evidence
establishes the following:
(1) That the territory sought to be annexed is contiguous to the
municipality.
(2) One (1) of the following:
(A) The resident population density of the territory sought to
be annexed is at least three (3) persons per acre.
(B) Sixty percent (60%) of the territory is subdivided.
(C) The territory is zoned for commercial, business, or
industrial uses.
(c) The requirements of this subsection are met if the evidence
establishes one (1) of the following:
(1) That the territory sought to be annexed is:
(A) contiguous to the municipality as required by section 1.5
of this chapter, except that at least one-fourth (1/4), instead of
one-eighth (1/8), of the aggregate external boundaries of the
territory sought to be annexed must coincide with the
boundaries of the municipality; and
(B) needed and can be used by the municipality for its
development in the reasonably near future.
(2) This subdivision applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance a written fiscal plan is adopted after
December 31, 2016. before March 30, 2026. That the territory
sought to be annexed involves an economic development project
and the requirements of section 11.4 of this chapter are met.
(3) The territory is described in section 5.2 of this chapter.
(d) The requirements of this subsection are met if the evidence
establishes that the municipality has developed and adopted a written
fiscal plan and has established a definite policy, by resolution of the
legislative body as set forth in section 3.1 of this chapter. The fiscal
plan must show the following:
(1) The cost estimates of planned services to be furnished to the
territory to be annexed. The plan must present itemized estimated
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


costs for each municipal department or agency.
(2) The method or methods of financing the planned services. The
plan must explain how specific and detailed expenses will be
funded and must indicate the taxes, grants, and other funding to
be used.
(3) The plan for the organization and extension of services. The
plan must detail the specific services that will be provided and the
dates the services will begin.
(4) That planned services of a noncapital nature, including police
protection, fire protection, street and road maintenance, and other
noncapital services normally provided within the corporate
boundaries, will be provided to the annexed territory within one
(1) year after the effective date of annexation and that they will be
provided in a manner equivalent in standard and scope to those
noncapital services provided to areas within the corporate
boundaries regardless of similar topography, patterns of land use,
and population density.
(5) That services of a capital improvement nature, including street
construction, street lighting, sewer facilities, water facilities, and
storm water drainage facilities, will be provided to the annexed
territory within three (3) years after the effective date of the
annexation in the same manner as those services are provided to
areas within the corporate boundaries, regardless of similar
topography, patterns of land use, and population density, and in
a manner consistent with federal, state, and local laws,
procedures, and planning criteria.
(6) This subdivision applies to a fiscal plan prepared after June
30, 2015. The estimated effect of the proposed annexation on
taxpayers in each of the political subdivisions to which the
proposed annexation applies, including the expected tax rates, tax
levies, expenditure levels, service levels, and annual debt service
payments in those political subdivisions for four (4) years after
the effective date of the annexation.
(7) This subdivision applies to a fiscal plan prepared after June
30, 2015. The estimated effect the proposed annexation will have
on municipal finances, specifically how municipal tax revenues
will be affected by the annexation for four (4) years after the
effective date of the annexation.
(8) This subdivision applies to a fiscal plan prepared after June
30, 2015. Any estimated effects on political subdivisions in the
county that are not part of the annexation and on taxpayers
located in those political subdivisions for four (4) years after the
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


effective date of the annexation.
(9) This subdivision applies to a fiscal plan prepared after June
30, 2015. A list of all parcels of property in the annexation
territory and the following information regarding each parcel:
(A) The name of the owner of the parcel.
(B) The parcel identification number.
(C) The most recent assessed value of the parcel.
(D) The existence of a known waiver of the right to
remonstrate on the parcel. This clause applies only to a
written fiscal plan prepared after June 30, 2016. adopted
before March 30, 2026.
(e) At the hearing under section 12 of this chapter with regard to
an annexation for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before
March 30, 2026, the court shall do the following:
(1) Consider evidence on the conditions listed in subdivision (2).
(2) Order a proposed annexation not to take place if the court
finds that all of the following conditions that are applicable to the
annexation exist in the territory proposed to be annexed:
(A) This clause applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance was adopted before July 1, 2015. The
following services are adequately furnished by a provider
other than the municipality seeking the annexation:
(i) Police and fire protection.
(ii) Street and road maintenance.
(B) The annexation will have a significant financial impact on
the residents or owners of land. The court may not consider:
(i) the personal finances; or
(ii) the business finances;
of a resident or owner of land. The personal and business
financial records of the residents or owners of land, including
state, federal, and local income tax returns, may not be subject
to a subpoena or discovery proceedings.
(C) The annexation is not in the best interests of the owners of
land in the territory proposed to be annexed as set forth in
subsection (f).
(D) This clause applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance is adopted before July 1, 2015. One (1)
of the following opposes the annexation:
(i) At least sixty-five percent (65%) of the owners of land in
the territory proposed to be annexed.
(ii) The owners of more than seventy-five percent (75%) in
assessed valuation of the land in the territory proposed to be
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


annexed.
Evidence of opposition may be expressed by any owner of land
in the territory proposed to be annexed.
(E) This clause applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance is adopted after June 30, 2015. One (1)
of the following opposes the annexation:
(i) At least fifty-one percent (51%) of the owners of land in
the territory proposed to be annexed.
(ii) The owners of more than sixty percent (60%) in assessed
valuation of the land in the territory proposed to be annexed.
The remonstrance petitions filed with the court under section
11 of this chapter are evidence of the number of owners of
land that oppose the annexation, minus any written revocations
of remonstrances that are filed with the court under section 11
of this chapter.
(F) This clause applies only to an annexation for which an
annexation ordinance is adopted before July 1, 2015. This
clause applies only to an annexation in which eighty percent
(80%) of the boundary of the territory proposed to be annexed
is contiguous to the municipality and the territory consists of
not more than one hundred (100) parcels. At least seventy-five
percent (75%) of the owners of land in the territory proposed
to be annexed oppose the annexation as determined under
section 11(b) of this chapter.
(f) This subsection applies only to an annexation for which a
written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026. The
municipality under subsection (e)(2)(C) bears the burden of proving
that the annexation is in the best interests of the owners of land in the
territory proposed to be annexed. In determining this issue, the court
may consider whether the municipality has extended sewer or water
services to the entire territory to be annexed:
(1) within the three (3) years preceding the date of the
introduction of the annexation ordinance; or
(2) under a contract in lieu of annexation entered into under
IC 36-4-3-21. section 21 of this chapter.
The court may not consider the provision of water services as a result
of an order by the Indiana utility regulatory commission to constitute
the provision of water services to the territory to be annexed.
(g) The most recent:
(1) federal decennial census;
(2) federal special census;
(3) special tabulation; or
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(4) corrected population count;
shall be used as evidence of resident population density for purposes
of subsection (b)(2)(A), but this evidence may be rebutted by other
evidence of population density.
(h) A municipality that prepares a fiscal plan after June 30, 2015,
must comply with this subsection. A municipality may not amend the
fiscal plan after the date that:
(1) a remonstrance is filed with the court under section 11 of this
chapter (in the case of an annexation for which a written fiscal
plan is adopted before March 30, 2026); or
(2) a petition is filed with the court under section 5.5 of this
chapter (in the case of an annexation for which a written fiscal
plan is adopted after March 29, 2026);
unless amendment of the fiscal plan is consented to by at least
sixty-five percent (65%) of the persons who signed the remonstrance
or the petition.
(i) The municipality must submit proof that the municipality has
complied with:
(1) the outreach program requirements and notice requirements
of section 1.7 of this chapter; and
(2) the requirements of section 11.1 of this chapter (in the case of
an annexation for which a written fiscal plan is adopted
before March 30, 2026).
SECTION 26. IC 36-4-3-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.228-2015,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15. (a) The court's judgment under section 12
or 15.5 of this chapter must specify the annexation ordinance. on which
the remonstrance is based. The clerk of the court shall deliver a
certified copy of the final and unappealable judgment to the clerk of the
municipality. The clerk of the municipality shall:
(1) record the judgment in the clerk's ordinance record; and
(2) make a cross-reference to the record of the judgment on the
margin of the record of the annexation ordinance.
(b) If a final and unappealable judgment under section 12 or 15.5 of
this chapter is adverse to annexation, the municipality may not make
further attempts to annex the territory or any part of the territory during
the four (4) years after the later of:
(1) the judgment of the circuit or superior court; or
(2) the date of the final disposition of all appeals to a higher court;
unless the annexation is petitioned for under section 5 or 5.1 of this
chapter.
(c) This subsection applies if a municipality repeals the annexation
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


ordinance:
(1) less than sixty-one (61) days after the publication of the
ordinance under section 7(a) of this chapter; and
(2) before the hearing commences:
(A) on the remonstrance under section 11(c) 11(b) of this
chapter (in the case of an annexation for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026); or
(B) on the petition under section 12(1)(B) of this chapter
(in the case of an annexation for which a written fiscal plan
is adopted after March 29, 2026).
A municipality may not make further attempts to annex the territory or
any part of the territory during the twelve (12) months after the date the
municipality repeals the annexation ordinance. This subsection does
not prohibit an annexation of the territory or part of the territory that is
petitioned for under section 5 or 5.1 of this chapter.
(d) This subsection applies if a municipality repeals the annexation
ordinance:
(1) at least sixty-one (61) days but not more than one hundred
twenty (120) days after the publication of the ordinance under
section 7(a) of this chapter; and
(2) before the hearing commences:
(A) on the remonstrance under section 11(c) 11(b) of this
chapter (in the case of an annexation for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026); or
(B) on the petition under section 12(1)(B) of this chapter
(in the case of an annexation for which a written fiscal plan
is adopted after March 29, 2026).
A municipality may not make further attempts to annex the territory or
any part of the territory during the twenty-four (24) months after the
date the municipality repeals the annexation ordinance. This subsection
does not prohibit an annexation of the territory or part of the territory
that is petitioned for under section 5 or 5.1 of this chapter.
(e) This subsection applies if a municipality repeals the annexation
ordinance:
(1) either:
(A) at least one hundred twenty-one (121) days after
publication of the ordinance under section 7(a) of this chapter
but before the hearing commences:
(i) on the remonstrance under section 11(c) 11(b) of this
chapter (in the case of an annexation for which a written
fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026); or
(ii) on the petition under section 12(1)(B) of this chapter
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(in the case of an annexation for which a written fiscal
plan is adopted after March 29, 2026); or
(B) after the hearing commences:
(i) on the remonstrance as set forth in section 11(c) 11(b) of
this chapter (in the case of an annexation for which a
written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026); or
(ii) on the petition under section 12(1)(B) of this chapter
(in the case of an annexation for which a written fiscal
plan is adopted after March 29, 2026); and
(2) before the date of the judgment of the circuit or superior court
as set forth in subsection (b).
A municipality may not make further attempts to annex the territory or
any part of the territory during the forty-two (42) months after the date
the municipality repeals the annexation ordinance. This subsection
does not prohibit an annexation of the territory or part of the territory
that is petitioned for under section 5 or 5.1 of this chapter.
(f) An annexation is effective when the clerk of the municipality
complies with the filing requirement of section 22(a) of this chapter.
SECTION 27. IC 36-4-3-15.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 138, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 15.3. (a) As used in this
section, "prohibition against annexation" means that a municipality
may not make further attempts to annex certain territory or any part of
that territory.
(b) As used in this section, "settlement agreement" means a written
court approved settlement of a dispute involving annexation under this
chapter between a municipality and remonstrators.
(c) Under a settlement agreement between the annexing
municipality and either:
(1) seventy-five percent (75%) or more of all landowners
participating in the remonstrance; or
(2) the owners of more than seventy-five percent (75%) in
assessed valuation of the land owned by all landowners
participating in the remonstrance;
the parties may mutually agree to a prohibition against annexation of
all or part of the territory by the municipality for a period not to exceed
twenty (20) years. The settlement agreement may address issues and
bind the parties to matters relating to the provision by a municipality
of planned services of a noncapital nature and services of a capital
improvement nature (as described in section 13(d) of this chapter), in
addition to a prohibition against annexation. The settlement agreement
is binding upon the successors, heirs, and assigns of the parties to the
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


agreement. However, the settlement agreement may be amended or
revised periodically on further agreement between the annexing
municipality and landowners who meet the qualifications of
subdivision (1) or (2).
(d) A settlement agreement executed after March 29, 2026, is
void.
SECTION 28. IC 36-4-3-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 16. (a) This
section does not apply to an annexation under section 4(a)(2),
4(a)(3), 4(b), 4(h), or 4.1 of this chapter.
(b) This section applies only to an annexation under section 5.1
or 5.2 of this chapter, if a written fiscal plan is adopted before
March 30, 2026.
(a) (c) Within one (1) year after the expiration of:
(1) the one (1) year period for implementation of planned services
of a noncapital nature under section 13(d)(4) of this chapter; or
(2) the three (3) year period for the implementation of planned
services of a capital improvement nature under section 13(d)(5)
of this chapter;
any person who pays taxes on property located within the annexed
territory may file a complaint alleging injury resulting from the failure
of the municipality to implement the plan. The complaint must name
the municipality as defendant and shall be filed with the circuit or
superior court of the county in which the annexed territory is located.
(b) (d) The court shall hear the case within sixty (60) days without
a jury. In order to be granted relief, the plaintiff must establish one (1)
of the following:
(1) That the municipality has without justification failed to
implement the plan required by section 13 of this chapter within
the specific time limit for implementation after annexation.
(2) That the municipality has not provided police protection, fire
protection, sanitary sewers, and water for human consumption
within the specific time limit for implementation, unless one (1)
of these services is being provided by a separate taxing district or
by a privately owned public utility.
(3) That the annexed territory is not receiving governmental and
proprietary services substantially equivalent in standard and scope
to the services provided by the municipality to other areas of the
municipality, regardless of topography, patterns of land use, and
population density similar to the annexed territory.
(c) (e) The court may:
(1) grant an injunction prohibiting the collection of taxes levied
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


by the municipality on the plaintiff's property located in the
annexed territory;
(2) award damages to the plaintiff not to exceed one and
one-fourth (1 1/4) times the taxes collected by the municipality
for the plaintiff's property located in the annexed territory;
(3) order the annexed territory or any part of it to be disannexed
from the municipality;
(4) order the municipality to submit a revised fiscal plan for
providing the services to the annexed territory within time limits
set up by the court; or
(5) grant any other appropriate relief.
(d) (f) A change of venue from the county is not permitted for an
action brought under this section.
(e) (g) If the court finds for the plaintiff, the defendant shall pay all
court costs and reasonable attorney's fees as approved by the court.
(f) (h) The provisions of this chapter that apply to territory
disannexed by other procedures apply to territory disannexed under this
section.
SECTION 29. IC 36-4-3-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.38-2021,
SECTION 84, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 22. (a) The clerk of the municipality shall file:
(1) each annexation ordinance:
(A) against which:
(A) (i) a remonstrance (in the case of an annexation for
which a written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30,
2026); or
(ii) an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter;
has not been filed during the period permitted under this
chapter; or
(B) against which a remonstrance was filed without a
sufficient number of signatures to meet the requirements of
section 11.3(c) of this chapter, in the case of an annexation for
which an annexation ordinance was a written fiscal plan is
adopted after June 30, 2015; before March 30, 2026; or
(2) the certified copy of a final and unappealable judgment
ordering an annexation to take place;
with the county auditor, circuit court clerk, and board of registration (if
a board of registration exists) of each county in which the annexed
territory is located, the office of the secretary of state, and the office of
census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2. The clerk of the
municipality shall record each annexation ordinance adopted under this
chapter in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


annexed territory is located.
(b) The ordinance or judgment must be filed and recorded no later
than ninety (90) days after:
(1) the expiration of the period permitted for:
(A) a remonstrance (in the case of an annexation for which
a written fiscal plan is adopted before March 30, 2026); or
(B) an appeal under section 15.5 of this chapter;
(2) the delivery of a certified order under section 15 of this
chapter; or
(3) the date the county auditor files the written certification with
the legislative body under section 11.2 of this chapter, in the case
of an annexation:
(A) described in subsection (a)(1)(B); and
(B) for which a written fiscal plan is adopted before March
30, 2026.
(c) Failure to record the annexation ordinance as provided in
subsection (a) does not invalidate the ordinance.
(d) The county auditor shall forward a copy of any annexation
ordinance filed under this section to the following:
(1) The county highway department of each county in which the
lots or lands affected are located.
(2) The county surveyor of each county in which the lots or lands
affected are located.
(3) Each plan commission, if any, that lost or gained jurisdiction
over the annexed territory.
(4) The sheriff of each county in which the lots or lands affected
are located.
(5) The township trustee of each township that lost or gained
jurisdiction over the annexed territory.
(6) The office of the secretary of state.
(7) The office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2.
(8) The department of local government finance, not later than
August 1, in the manner described by the department.
(e) The county auditor may require the clerk of the municipality to
furnish an adequate number of copies of the annexation ordinance or
may charge the clerk a fee for photoreproduction of the ordinance. The
county auditor shall notify the office of the secretary of state and the
office of census data established by IC 2-5-1.1-12.2 of the date that the
annexation ordinance is effective under this chapter.
(f) The county auditor or county surveyor shall, upon determining
that an annexation ordinance has become effective under this chapter,
indicate the annexation upon the property taxation records maintained
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


in the office of the auditor or the office of the county surveyor.
SECTION 30. IC 36-4-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
SECTION 162, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 7. (a) The fiscal officer shall
present the report of budget estimates to the city legislative body under
IC 6-1.1-17. After reviewing the report, the legislative body shall
prepare an ordinance fixing the rate of taxation for the ensuing budget
year and an ordinance making appropriations for the estimated
department budgets and other city purposes during the ensuing budget
year. The legislative body, in the appropriation ordinance, may reduce
any estimated item from the figure submitted in the report of the fiscal
officer, but it may increase an item only if the executive recommends
an increase. The legislative body shall promptly act on the
appropriation ordinance.
(b) In preparing the ordinances described in subsection (a) the
legislative body shall make an allowance for the cost of fire protection
to annexed territory described in IC 36-4-3-7(c), IC 36-4-3-7(d), for
the year fire protection is first offered to that territory.
SECTION 31. IC 36-9-22-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 148, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2. (a) The power of the
municipal works board to fix the terms of a contract under this section
applies to contracts for the installation of sewage works that have not
been finally approved or accepted for full maintenance and operation
by the municipality on July 1, 1979.
(b) The works board of a municipality may contract with owners of
real property for the construction of sewage works within the
municipality or within four (4) miles outside its corporate boundaries
in order to provide service for the area in which the real property of the
owners is located. The contract must provide, for a period of not to
exceed fifteen (15) years, for the payment to the owners and their
assigns by any owner of real property who:
(1) did not contribute to the original cost of the sewage works;
and
(2) subsequently taps into, uses, or deposits sewage or storm
waters in the sewage works or any lateral sewers connected to
them;
of a fair pro rata share of the cost of the construction of the sewage
works, subject to the rules of the board and notwithstanding any other
law relating to the functions of local governmental entities. However,
the contract does not apply to any owner of real property who is not a
party to the contract unless the contract or (after June 30, 2013) a
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


signed memorandum of the contract has been recorded in the office of
the recorder of the county in which the real property of the owner is
located before the owner taps into or connects to the sewers and
facilities. The board may provide that the fair pro rata share of the cost
of construction includes interest at a rate not exceeding the amount of
interest allowed on judgments, and the interest shall be computed from
the date the sewage works are approved until the date payment is made
to the municipality.
(c) The contract must include, as part of the consideration running
to the municipality, the release of the right of:
(1) the parties to the contract; and
(2) the successors in title of the parties to the contract;
to remonstrate against pending or future annexations by the
municipality of the area served by the sewage works. Any person
tapping into or connecting to the sewage works contracted for is
considered to waive the person's rights to remonstrate against the
annexation of the area served by the sewage works. This subsection
expires March 30, 2026.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (c), the works board of a
municipality may waive the provisions of subsection (c) in the contract
if:
(1) the works board considers a waiver of subsection (c) to be in
the best interests of the municipality; or
(2) the contract involves connection to the sewage works under
IC 36-9-22.5.
This subsection expires March 30, 2026.
(e) This subsection does not affect any rights or liabilities accrued,
or proceedings begun before July 1, 2013. Those rights, liabilities, and
proceedings continue and shall be imposed and enforced under prior
law as if this subsection had not been enacted. For contracts executed
after June 30, 2013, and before March 30, 2026, if the release of the
right to remonstrate is not void under subsection (i), (j), or (k), or (l),
the release is binding on a successor in title to a party to the contract
only if the successor in title:
(1) has actual notice of the release; or
(2) has constructive notice of the release because the contract, or
a signed memorandum of the contract stating the release, has been
recorded in the chain of title of the property.
(f) Subsection (c) does not apply to a landowner if all of the
following conditions apply:
(1) The landowner is required to connect to the sewage works
because a person other than the landowner has polluted or
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


contaminated the area.
(2) The costs of extension of or connection to the sewage works
are paid by a person other than the landowner or the municipality.
This subsection expires March 30, 2026.
(g) Subsection (c) does not apply to a landowner who taps into,
connects to, or is required to tap into or connect to the sewage works
of a municipality only because the municipality provides wholesale
sewage service (as defined in IC 8-1-2-61.7) to another municipality
that provides sewage service to the landowner. This subsection
expires March 30, 2026.
(h) This subsection applies to any deed recorded after June 30,
2015, and before March 30, 2026. This subsection applies only to
property that is subject to a remonstrance waiver. A municipality shall
provide written notice to any successor in title to property within a
reasonable time after the deed is recorded, that a waiver of the right of
remonstrance exists with respect to the property.
(i) A remonstrance waiver executed on or before July 1, 2003, is
void. This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was
effective on or before July 1, 2019.
(j) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2003, and not
later than June 30, 2019, is subject to the following:
(1) The waiver is void unless the waiver was recorded:
(A) before January 1, 2020; and
(B) with the county recorder of the county where the property
subject to the waiver is located.
(2) A waiver that is not void under subdivision (1) or subsection
(l), expires not later than fifteen (15) years after the date the
waiver is executed.
This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(k) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2019, is subject
to the following: (1) The waiver is void unless the waiver is must be
recorded (A) not later than thirty (30) business days after the date the
waiver was executed and (B) with the county recorder of the county
where the property subject to the waiver is located. (2) A waiver that
is not void under subdivision (1) expires not later than fifteen (15)
years after the date the waiver is executed. This subsection does not
invalidate an annexation that was effective on or before July 1, 2019.
(l) Notwithstanding any other law, a waiver of the right of
remonstrance is valid and binding on a landowner or a successor
in title only with regard to an annexation for which the written
fiscal plan was adopted before March 30, 2026.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


SECTION 32. IC 36-9-25-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 149, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 14. (a) As to each municipality
to which this chapter applies:
(1) all the territory included within the corporate boundaries of
the municipality; and
(2) any territory, town, addition, platted subdivision, or unplatted
land lying outside the corporate boundaries of the municipality
that has been taken into the district in accordance with a prior
statute, the sewage or drainage of which discharges into or
through the sewage system of the municipality;
constitutes a special taxing district for the purpose of providing for the
sanitary disposal of the sewage of the district in a manner that protects
the public health and prevents the undue pollution of watercourses of
the district.
(b) Upon request by:
(1) a resolution adopted by the legislative body of another
municipality in the same county; or
(2) a petition of the majority of the resident freeholders in a
platted subdivision or of the owners of unplatted land outside the
boundaries of a municipality, if the platted subdivision or
unplatted land is in the same county;
the board may adopt a resolution incorporating all or any part of the
area of the municipality, platted subdivision, or unplatted land into the
district.
(c) A request under subsection (b) must be signed and certified as
correct by the secretary of the legislative body, resident freeholders, or
landowners. The original shall be preserved in the records of the board.
The resolution of the board incorporating an area in the district must be
in writing and must contain an accurate description of the area
incorporated into the district. A certified copy of the resolution, signed
by the president and secretary of the board, together with a map
showing the boundaries of the district and the location of additional
areas, shall be delivered to the auditor of the county within which the
district is located. It shall be properly indexed and kept in the
permanent records of the offices of the auditor.
(d) In addition, upon request by ten (10) or more interested resident
freeholders in a platted or unplatted territory, the board may define the
limits of an area within the county and including the property of the
freeholders that is to be considered for inclusion into the district.
Notice of the defining of the area by the board, and notice of the
location and limits of the area, shall be given by publication in
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


accordance with IC 5-3-1. Upon request by a majority of the resident
freeholders of the area, the area may be incorporated into the district in
the manner provided in this section. The resolution of the board
incorporating the area into the district and a map of the area shall be
made and filed in the same manner.
(e) In addition, a person owning or occupying real property outside
the district may enter into a sewer service agreement with the board for
connection to the sewage works of the district. If the agreement
provides for connection at a later time, the date or the event upon
which the service commences shall be stated in the agreement. The
agreement may impose any conditions for connection that the board
determines. The agreement must also provide the amount of service
charge to be charged for connection if the persons are not covered
under section 11 of this chapter, with the amount to be fixed by the
board in its discretion and without a hearing.
(f) All sewer service agreements made under subsection (e) or (after
June 30, 2013) a signed memorandum of the sewer service agreement
shall be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county where the
property is located. The agreements run with the property described
and are binding upon the persons owning or occupying the property,
their personal representatives, heirs, devisees, grantees, successors, and
assigns. Each agreement that is recorded, or each agreement of which
a signed memorandum is recorded, and that provides for the property
being served to be placed on the tax rolls shall be certified by the board
to the auditor of the county where the property is located. The
certification must state the date the property is to be placed on the tax
rolls, and upon receipt of the certification together with a copy of the
agreement, the auditor shall immediately place the property certified
upon the rolls of property subject to the levy and collection of taxes for
the district. An agreement may provide for the collection of a service
charge for the period services are rendered before the levy and
collection of the tax.
(g) Except as provided in subsections (j) and (l), sewer service
agreements made under subsection (e) must contain a waiver provision
that persons (other than municipalities) who own or occupy property
agree for themselves, their executors, administrators, heirs, devisees,
grantees, successors, and assigns that they will:
(1) neither object to nor file a remonstrance against the proposed
annexation of the property by a municipality within the
boundaries of the district;
(2) not appeal from an order or a judgment annexing the property
to a municipality; and
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(3) not file a complaint or an action against annexation
proceedings.
This subsection expires March 30, 2026.
(h) This subsection does not affect any rights or liabilities accrued
or proceedings begun before July 1, 2013. Those rights, liabilities, and
proceedings continue and shall be imposed and enforced under prior
law as if this subsection had not been enacted. For contracts executed
after June 30, 2013, and before March 30, 2026, a waiver of the right
to remonstrate under subsection (g) (before its expiration) that is not
void under subsection (m), (n), or (o), or (p) is binding as to an
executor, administrator, heir, devisee, grantee, successor, or assign of
a party to a sewer service agreement under subsection (g) (before its
expiration) only if the executor, administrator, heir, devisee, grantee,
successor, or assign:
(1) has actual notice of the waiver; or
(2) has constructive notice of the waiver because the sewer
service agreement or a signed memorandum of the sewer service
agreement stating the waiver has been recorded in the chain of
title of the property.
(i) This section does not affect any sewer service agreements
entered into before March 13, 1953. However, this section applies to
a remonstrance waiver regardless of when the waiver was executed.
(j) Subsection (g) does not apply to a landowner if all of the
following conditions apply:
(1) The landowner is required to connect to a sewer service
because a person other than the landowner has polluted or
contaminated the area.
(2) The costs of extension of service or connection to the sewer
service are paid by a person other than the landowner or the
municipality.
This subsection expires March 30, 2026.
(k) This subsection applies to any deed recorded after June 30,
2015, and before March 30, 2026. This subsection applies only to
property that is subject to a remonstrance waiver. A municipality shall
provide written notice to any successor in title to property within a
reasonable time after the deed is recorded, that a waiver of the right of
remonstrance has been granted with respect to the property.
(l) The board may waive the waiver provision described in
subsection (g) in a sewer service agreement made under subsection (e)
if the sewer service agreement involves a connection to the district's
sewage works under IC 36-9-22.5. This subsection expires March 30,
2026.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87


(m) A remonstrance waiver executed before July 1, 2003, is void.
This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(n) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2003, and before
July 1, 2019, is subject to the following:
(1) The waiver is void unless the waiver was recorded:
(A) before January 1, 2020; and
(B) with the county recorder of the county where the property
subject to the waiver is located.
(2) A waiver that is not void under subdivision (1) or subsection
(p) expires not later than fifteen (15) years after the date the
waiver is executed.
This subsection does not invalidate an annexation that was effective on
or before July 1, 2019.
(o) A remonstrance waiver executed after June 30, 2019, is subject
to the following: (1) The waiver is void unless the waiver is must be
recorded (A) not later than thirty (30) business days after the date the
waiver was executed and (B) with the county recorder of the county
where the property subject to the waiver is located. (2) A waiver that
is not void under subdivision (1) expires not later than fifteen (15)
years after the date the waiver is executed. This subsection does not
invalidate an annexation that was effective on or before July 1, 2019.
(p) Notwithstanding any other law, a waiver of the right of
remonstrance is valid and binding on a landowner or a successor
in title only with regard to an annexation for which the written
fiscal plan was adopted before March 30, 2026.
SECTION 33. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1205—LS 6651/DI 87